src-fst-stems-nouns.lexc.md
# Tsuut'ina Nouns
## Classification
1. Always unpossessed nouns: nàk'ús "cloud"
1. Always possessed nouns: sitsì "my head" (body parts, kinship terms)
1. Possessed or unpossessed: tłích'á "dog" vs. silích'à "my dog"

Three (phonological) cases for the possessive prefixes:
# Consonant-initial stem: si- "1SG" tsì "head" -> sitsì "my head"
# Preceding H-tone stem: si- "1SG" V́tsí "nose" -> sítsí "my nose" 
# Vowel-initial stem: si- "1SG" óó "mother" -> sóó "my mother" \\
(cf. ʔinóó "mother" , ʔi- "UNSPEC.POSS" (n)óó;
```gu- "SOMEONE" óó "mother" -> gwóó gu > gw / _ [oa] ) Cu[oa] > Cw[oa]?```

Periphrastic / non-morphological constructions are used for always
unpossessed nouns: sá(à) nàk'ús "my cloud", ná(à) ʔidínít'ùgù
yiitł'áłí "your vehicle")

## Lexicons

* LEXICON AlwaysUnpossessedNouns  never Px

* LEXICON AlwaysPossessedNouns   always Px, body part, kinship

* LEXICON UnpossessedNouns   Px or not, here not. Cf. PossessedNouns

* LEXICON PossessedNouns   Px or not, here Px. Cf. UnpossessedNouns

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-srs/blob/main/src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc)</small>

---
